Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 1 COUNTY PLANNING
30-28-110. Regional planning commission approval - required when - recording.

Whenever any county planning commission or, if there is none, any regional planning commission has adopted a master plan of the county or any part thereof, no road, park, or other public way, ground, or space, no public building or structure, or no public utility, whether publicly or privately owned, shall be constructed or authorized in the unincorporated territory of the county until and unless the proposed location and extent thereof has been submitted to and approved by such county or regional planning commission.

In case of disapproval, the commission shall communicate its reasons to the board of county commissioners of the county in which the public way, ground, space, building, structure, or utility is proposed to be located. Such board has the power to overrule such disapproval by a vote of not less than a majority of its entire membership. Upon such overruling, said board or other official in charge of the proposed construction or authorization may proceed therewith.

If the public way, ground, space, building, structure, or utility is one the authorization or financing of which does not, under the law governing the same, fall within the province of the board of county commissioners or other county officials or board, the submission to the commission shall be by the body or official having such jurisdiction, and the commission's disapproval may be overruled by said body by a vote of not less than a majority of its entire membership or by said official. In the case of a utility owned by an entity other than a political subdivision, the submission to the commission shall be by the utility and shall not be by the public utilities commission; however, the commission's disapproval may be overruled by the public utilities commission by a vote of not less than a majority of its entire membership.

The acceptance, widening, removal, extension, relocation, narrowing, vacation, abandonment, change of use, or sale or lease of or acquisition of land for any road, park, or other public way, ground, place, property, or structure shall be subject to similar submission and approval, and the failure to approve may be similarly overruled.

The failure of the commission to act within thirty days after the date of official submission to it shall be deemed approval, unless a longer period is granted by the submitting board, body, or official.

In any geographic area of common planning jurisdiction, which area consists of part or all of several counties for which a regional plan has been duly adopted, the district, county, or municipal planning commission shall refer to the regional planning commission for review any proposed new or changed land use plan, zoning amendments, subdivision proposals, housing codes, sign codes, urban renewal projects, proposed public facilities, or other planning functions which clearly affect another local governmental unit, or which affect the region as a whole, or which are the subject of primary responsibility of the regional planning commission.

In any geographic area of common planning jurisdiction which involves part or all of only one county for which a regional plan has been duly adopted, the district, county, or municipal planning commission shall refer to the regional planning commission for review any proposed new or changed land use plan, zoning amendments, subdivision proposals, housing codes, sign codes, urban renewal projects, proposed public facilities, or other planning functions which clearly affect another local governmental unit, or which affect the region as a whole, or which are the subject of primary responsibility of the regional planning commission.

The regional planning commission shall, within thirty days after the receipt of such referral, report to the district, county, or municipal planning commission on the effect of the referred matter on the regional plan. This time may be extended by mutual agreement. If, during the review time, a satisfactory adjustment in the referred matter cannot be worked out, the regional planning commission may report to the district, county, or municipal planning commission that this referred matter is inconsistent with the regional plan. In that case, if the district, county, or municipality has theretofore adopted the regional plan for the development of its area, the concurrent vote of two-thirds of the total membership of the district, county, or municipal planning commission shall be required to issue a different independent report on such matters. In all instances, the regional planning commission may also forward its report on the referred matter to the governing body of the governmental unit having authority to decide the matter.

The failure of the regional planning commission to reply within thirty days after the receipt of the referral, or within the agreed extension of time, shall be deemed approval of the matter referred.

A failure on the part of any district, county, or municipal planning commission to refer to the regional planning commission any plan or authorization provided for in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (2) shall be deemed a determination by such district, county, or municipal planning commission that the matter is local in nature.

The regional planning commission, on its own initiative, may initiate a review of any matter involving its regional planning functions, whether such matter has been referred to it or not, if the subject of the review affects two or more local jurisdictions and may make a report of the result of such review to the governing bodies of the jurisdictions involved.

The provisions of this subsection (2) shall not apply to any proposed business or industrial zoning change of less than twenty acres nor to any proposed residential zoning change or subdivision of less than forty acres.

All plans of streets or highways for public use, and all plans, plats, plots, and replots of land laid out in subdivision or building lots and the streets, highways, alleys, or other portions of the same intended to be dedicated to a public use or the use of purchasers or owners of lots fronting thereon or adjacent thereto, shall be submitted to the board of county commissioners for review and subsequent approval, conditional approval, or disapproval. It is not lawful to record any such plan or plat in any public office unless the same bears thereon, by endorsement or otherwise, the approval of the board of county commissioners and after review by the appropriate planning commission.

The approval of said plan or plat by such commission shall not be deemed an acceptance of the proposed dedication by the public. Such acceptance, if any, shall be given by action of the governing body of the municipality or by the board of county commissioners. The owners and purchasers of such lots shall be presumed to have notice of public plans, maps, and reports of such commission affecting such property within its jurisdiction.

Any subdivider, or agent of a subdivider, who transfers legal or equitable title or sells any subdivided land before a final plat for such subdivided land has been approved by the board of county commissioners and recorded or filed in the office of the county clerk and recorder is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars nor less than five hundred dollars for each parcel of or interest in subdivided land which is sold. All fines collected under this paragraph (a) shall be credited to the general fund of the county. No person shall be prosecuted, tried, or punished under this paragraph (a) unless the indictment, information, complaint, or action for the same is instituted prior to the expiration of eighteen months after the recordation or filing in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the instrument transferring or selling such subdivided land. The board of county commissioners may provide for the enforcement of subdivision regulations by means of withholding building permits. No plat for subdivided land shall be approved by the board of county commissioners unless at the time of the approval of platting the subdivider provides the certification of the county treasurer's office that all ad valorem taxes applicable to such subdivided land, for years prior to that year in which approval is granted, have been paid.

The board of county commissioners of the county in which the subdivided land is located has the power to bring an action to enjoin any subdivider from selling subdivided land before a final plat for such subdivided land has been approved by the board of county commissioners.

The board of county commissioners shall distribute, or cause to be distributed, the sets of plans or plats submitted to the agencies as referred to in section 30-28-136 (1).

Any violation of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) is prima facie evidence of a fraudulent land transaction and shall be grounds for the purchaser to void the transfer or sale.

This subsection (4) applies only with respect to parcels of land less than thirty-five acres in area.

Notice of the filing of preliminary plans of any type required by this section to be submitted to a district, regional, or county planning commission or to the board of county commissioners, if the situs of these plans lies wholly or partially within two miles of the corporate limits of a municipality but not within the corporate limits of another municipality, shall be referred to the town or city clerk of such municipality by the county planning commission or, if there be none, by the board of county commissioners. Within fourteen days of the receipt of such plans, the municipality, by action of its city council or town board, or, if one exists, by action of its planning commission, may make its recommendations to the board of county commissioners, which shall forward the same to the district, regional, or county planning commission, if any. Failure of the town board, city council, or agents designated by them to make any recommendation within fourteen days of the receipt of such plans shall constitute waiver of its right to make such recommendation.

If such recommendation is made by the municipality, it shall be taken into consideration by the board of county commissioners and district, regional, or county planning commission, if any, before action is taken upon the plans. The board of county commissioners and district, regional, or county planning commission, if any, shall take no action on such plans until the recommendation of the municipality is received or until fifteen days after receipt of the preliminary plans, whichever is sooner.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 298, § 9.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-9.

L. 59:

p. 619, § 4.

L. 61:

p. 592, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-9.

L. 72:

pp. 498, 499, §§ 2, 3.

L. 79:

(4)(a) amended, p. 1166, § 1, effective June 15.

L. 83:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1252, § 1, effective June 3; (4)(a) and (4)(b) amended and (4)(d) and (4)(e) added, p. 1250, § 2, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For required monumentation within a subdivision before sales contract is executed, see § 38-51-105 (3) and (4).

30-28-111. Zoning plan.

The county planning commission of any county may, and upon order by the board of county commissioners in any county having a county planning commission shall, make a zoning plan for zoning all or any part of the unincorporated territory within such county, including both the full text of the zoning resolution and the maps, and representing the recommendations of the commission for the regulation by districts or zones of the location, height, bulk, and size of buildings and other structures, percentage of lot which may be occupied, the size of lots, courts, and other open spaces, the density and distribution of population, the location and use of buildings and structures for trade, industry, residence, recreation, public activities, or other purposes, access to sunlight for solar energy devices, and the uses of land for trade, industry, recreation, or other purposes. To the end that adequate safety may be secured, the county planning commission may include in said zoning plan provisions establishing, regulating, and limiting such uses on or along any storm or floodwater runoff channel or basin as such storm or floodwater runoff channel or basin has been designated and approved by the Colorado water conservation board in order to lessen or avoid the hazards to persons and damage to property resulting from the accumulation of storm or floodwaters.

The county planning commission or the board of adjustment of any county, in the exercise of powers pursuant to this article, may condition any portion of a zoning resolution, any amendment thereto, or any exception to the terms thereof upon the preservation, improvement, or construction of any storm or floodwater runoff channel designated and approved by the Colorado water conservation board.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 299, § 10.

CSA:

C. 45A § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-10.

L. 66:

p. 42, § 5.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 1160, § 3, effective May 25.

30-28-112. Certification of plan - hearings.

The county planning commission shall certify a copy of the plans for zoning all or any part of the unincorporated territory within the county, or any adopted part or amendment thereof or addition thereto, to the board of county commissioners of the county. After receiving the certification of said zoning plans from the commission and before the adoption of any zoning resolutions, the board of county commissioners shall hold a public hearing thereon, the time and place of which at least fourteen days' notice shall be given by one publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. Such notice shall state the place at which the text and maps so certified by the county planning commission may be examined. No substantial change in or departure from the text or map so certified by the county planning commission shall be made unless such change or departure is first submitted to the certifying county planning commission for its approval, disapproval, or suggestions and, if disapproved, shall receive the favorable vote of not less than a majority of the entire membership of the board of county commissioners. The county planning commission shall have thirty days after such submission within which to send its report to the board of county commissioners.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 299, § 11.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-11.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 965, § 4, effective June 1.

30-28-113. Regulation of size and use - districts - definitions - repeal.

Except as otherwise provided in section 34-1-305, C.R.S., when the county planning commission of any county makes, adopts, and certifies to the board of county commissioners plans for zoning the unincorporated territory within any county, or any part thereof, including both the full text of a zoning resolution and the maps, after public hearing thereon, the board of county commissioners, by resolution, may regulate, in any portions of such county that lie outside of cities and towns:

The location, height, bulk, and size of buildings and other structures;

The percentage of lots that may be occupied;

The size of yards, courts, and other open spaces;

The uses of buildings and structures for trade, industry, residence, recreation, public activities, or other purposes;

Access to sunlight for solar energy devices; and

The uses of land for trade, industry, residence, recreation, or other purposes and for flood control.

In order to accomplish such regulation, the board of county commissioners:

May divide the territory of the county that lies outside of cities and towns into districts or zones of such number, shape, or area as it may determine, and, within such districts or any of them, may regulate the erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, and uses of buildings and structures and the uses of land; and

May require and provide for the issuance of building permits as a condition precedent to the right to erect, construct, reconstruct, or alter any building or structure within any district covered by such zoning resolution.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the aggregate of all charges or other related or associated fees a county shall impose or assess to install an active solar energy system or geothermal energy system shall not exceed the lesser of the county's actual costs in issuing the permit or five hundred dollars for a residential application or one thousand dollars for a nonresidential application if the device or system produces fewer than two megawatts of direct current electricity or an equivalent-sized thermal energy system, or that exceed the county's actual costs in issuing the permit if the device or system produces at least two megawatts of direct current electricity or an equivalent-sized thermal energy system. A county may increase its fees or other charges as authorized by this subsection (1)(b)(II) by no more than five percent on an annual basis until the five hundred dollar limitation specified in this subsection (1)(b)(II) is achieved. The county shall clearly and individually identify all fees and taxes assessed on an application subject to this subsection (1)(b)(II) on the invoice. The general assembly hereby finds that there is a statewide need for certainty regarding the fees that can be assessed for permitting such devices or systems, and therefore declares that this subsection (1)(b)(II) is a matter of statewide concern. This subsection (1)(b)(II) is repealed, effective December 31, 2029.

In the case of a nonresidential application, on an individual installation basis only, if the county incurs actual costs for issuing the permit that are greater than one thousand dollars, the county is entitled to recovery of its actual costs for issuing the permit by submitting in writing and disclosing to the applicant for the particular permit proof of the county's actual costs.

As used in this subsection (1)(b)(II), "active solar energy system" means a single system that contains electric generation, a thermal device, or is an energy storage system as defined in section 40-2-202 (2), and "geothermal energy system" means a system that uses geothermal energy for water heating or space heating or cooling in a single building, for space heating for more than one building through a pipeline network, or for electricity generation.

The county planning commission may make and certify a single plan for the entire unincorporated portion of the county or separate and successive plans for those parts which it deems to be urbanized or suitable for urban development and those parts which, by reason of distance from existing urban communities or for other causes, it deems suitable for nonurban development. Any resolution adopted by the board of county commissioners may cover and include the unincorporated territory covered and included in any such single plan or in any of such separate and successive plans. No resolution covering more or less than the territory covered by any such certified plan shall be adopted or put into effect until and unless it is first submitted to the county planning commission which certified the plan to the board of county commissioners and is approved by said commission or, if disapproved, receives the favorable vote of not less than a majority of the entire membership of such board. All such regulations shall be uniform for each class or kind of building or structure throughout any district, but the regulations in any one district may differ from those in other districts.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 300, § 12.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-12.

L. 66:

p. 43, § 6.

L. 73:

p. 1054, § 18.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 1160, § 4, effective January 1, 1980.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 892, § 1, effective May 20.

L. 2011:

(1)(b)(II) amended, (HB 11-1199), ch. 311, p. 1518, § 2, effective June 10.

L. 2017:

(1)(b)(II) amended, (SB 17-179), ch. 170, p. 621, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

(1)(b)(II) amended, (HB 21-1284), ch. 327, p. 2090, § 3, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(1)(b)(II)(A) and (1)(b)(II)(C) amended, (SB 22-118), ch. 335, p. 2371, § 6, effective August 10.

Cross references:

(1) In 2011, subsection (1)(b)(II) was amended by the "Fair Permit Act". For the short title, see section 1 of chapter 311, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1284, see section 1 of chapter 327, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

30-28-114. Enforcement - inspector - permits.

The board of county commissioners may provide for the enforcement of the zoning regulations by means of the withholding of building permits, and, for such purpose, may establish and fill a position of county building inspector and may fix the compensation attached to said position, or may authorize one or more administrative officials of the county to assume some or all functions of such position in addition to their customary functions. Such board may also fix a reasonable schedule of fees for the issuance of such permits. After the establishment of such position and the filling of the same, it shall be unlawful to erect, construct, reconstruct, alter, or change the use of any building or other structure within the unincorporated territory covered by such zoning regulations without obtaining a building permit from such county building inspector. Such building inspector shall not issue any permit unless the plans for the proposed erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, or use fully conform to all zoning regulations then in effect.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 300, § 13.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-13.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1458, § 1, effective June 9.

30-28-115. Public welfare to be promoted - legislative declaration - construction.

Such regulations shall be designed and enacted for the purpose of promoting the health, safety, morals, convenience, order, prosperity, or welfare of the present and future inhabitants of the state, including lessening the congestion in the streets or roads or reducing the waste of excessive amounts of roads, promoting energy conservation, securing safety from fire, floodwaters, and other dangers, providing adequate light and air, classifying land uses and distributing land development and utilization, protecting the tax base, securing economy in governmental expenditures, fostering the state's agricultural and other industries, and protecting both urban and nonurban development.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that it is the policy of the state to assist persons who have an intellectual and developmental disability to live in typical residential surroundings. Further, the general assembly declares that the establishment of state-licensed group homes for the exclusive use of persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, which are known as community residential homes as defined in section

25.5-10-202

, C.R.S., is a matter of statewide concern and that a state-licensed group home for eight persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities is a residential use of property for zoning purposes. The phrase "residential use of property for zoning purposes", as used in this subsection (2), includes all forms of residential zoning and specifically, although not exclusively, single-family residential zoning. As used in this section, "person with a developmental disability" has the same meaning as "person with an intellectual and developmental disability" as set forth in section

25.5-10-202

, C.R.S.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2001, p. 103, § 1, effective March 21, 2001.)

The general assembly declares that the establishment of group homes for the aged for the exclusive use of not more than eight persons sixty years of age or older per home is a matter of statewide concern. The general assembly further finds and declares that it is the policy of this state to enable and assist persons sixty years of age or older who do not need nursing facilities and who so elect to live in normal residential surroundings, including single-family residential units. Group homes for the aged shall be distinguished from nursing facilities, as defined in section

25.5-4-103

(14), and institutions providing life care, as defined in section

11-49-101 (6)

. Every county having adopted or that shall adopt a zoning ordinance shall provide for the location of group homes for the aged. A group home for the aged established under this subsection (2)(b)(II) shall not be located within seven hundred fifty feet of another such group home, unless otherwise provided for by the county.

The general assembly declares that the establishment of state-licensed group homes for the exclusive use of persons with behavioral or mental health disorders, as defined in section

27-65-102

, is a matter of statewide concern and that a state-licensed group home for eight persons with behavioral or mental health disorders is a residential use of property for zoning purposes, as defined in section

31-23-301 (4)

. A group home for persons with behavioral or mental health disorders established pursuant to this subsection (2)(b.5) must not be located within seven hundred fifty feet of another such group home or of another group home as described in subsections (2)(a) and (2)(b) of this section, unless otherwise provided for by the county. A person must not be placed in a group home without being screened by either a professional person, as defined in section

27-65-102

(27), or any other mental health professional designated by the director of a facility, which facility is approved by the commissioner of the behavioral health administration. Persons determined to be not guilty by reason of insanity to a violent offense must not be placed in such group homes, and any person who has been convicted of a felony involving a violent offense is not eligible for placement in such group homes. This subsection (2)(b.5) must be implemented, where appropriate, by the rules of the department of public health and environment concerning residential treatment facilities for persons with behavioral or mental health disorders. Nothing in this subsection (2)(b.5) exempts such group homes from compliance with any state, county, or municipal health, safety, and fire codes.

Nothing in this subsection (2) shall be construed to supersede the authority of municipalities and counties to regulate such homes appropriately through local zoning ordinances or resolutions, except insofar as such regulation would be tantamount to prohibition of such homes from any residential district. This section is specifically not to be construed to permit violation of the provisions of any zoning ordinance or resolution with respect to height, setbacks, area, lot coverage, or external signage or to permit architectural designs substantially inconsistent with the character of the surrounding neighborhood. This section is also not to be construed to permit conducting of the ministerial activities of any private or public organization or agency or to permit types of treatment activities or the rendering of services in a manner substantially inconsistent with the activities otherwise permitted in the particular zoning district. If reasonably related to the requirements of a particular home, a local zoning or other development regulation may, without violating the provisions of this section, also attach specific location requirements to the approval of the group home, including the availability of such services and facilities as convenience stores, commercial services, transportation, and public recreation facilities.

(2.5) In connection with an application for development approval of the siting of a new facility to be used exclusively as a group home for the aged or for at-risk adults under the county's subdivision, zoning, platting, planned unit development, or other similar land development regulations, in addition to any other information required to be submitted, the county may request the applicant to submit a transportation plan showing how the operators of the facility intend to meet the transportation needs of the residents of the facility. The sufficiency of the transportation plan submitted pursuant to this subsection (2.5) may be considered by the county in reviewing the application but may not, by itself, constitute grounds for denying the application.

As used in this subsection (3), unless the context otherwise requires:

Repealed.

"Equivalent performance engineering basis" means that by using engineering calculations or testing, following commonly accepted engineering practices, all components and subsystems will perform to meet health, safety, and functional requirements to the same extent as required for other single family housing units.

No county may have or enact zoning regulations, subdivision regulations, or any other regulation affecting development which exclude or have the effect of excluding homes from the county that are:

Homes certified by the division of housing created in section 24-32-704 or a party authorized to act on its behalf;

Homes certified by the United States department of housing and urban development through its office of manufactured housing programs, a successor agency, or a party authorized to act on its behalf; or

Homes that meet or exceed, on an equivalent performance engineering basis, standards established by the county building code.

Nothing in this subsection (3) shall prevent a county from enacting any zoning, developmental, use, aesthetic, or historical standard, including, but not limited to, requirements relating to permanent foundations, minimum floor space, unit size or sectional requirements, and improvement location, side yard, and setback standards to the extent that such standards or requirements are applicable to existing or new housing within the specific use district of the county.

Nothing in this subsection (3) shall preclude any county from enacting county building code provisions for unique public safety requirements such as snow load roof, wind shear, and energy conservation factors, unless the home is certified by the division of housing created in section 24-32-704 or a party authorized to act on its behalf or the United States department of housing and urban development through its office of manufactured housing programs, a successor agency, or a party authorized to act on its behalf. A county must comply with section 24-32-3318 when enacting building code provisions for a manufactured home as defined in section 24-32-3302 (20).

Nothing in this subsection (3) shall be deemed to supersede any valid covenants running with the land.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 301, § 14.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-14.

L. 66:

p. 43, § 7.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 933, § 56, effective July 14.

L. 76:

(2)(a.5) added, p. 695, § 1, effective April 29.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 1161, § 5, effective January 1, 1980.

L. 84:

(3) added, p. 823, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 87:

(2)(b.5) added, p. 1216, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(2)(b) amended, p. 1476, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(2)(b)(II) amended, p. 1858, § 20, effective April 11.

L. 94:

(2)(b.5) amended, p. 2715, § 297, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(2)(a), (2)(b), and (2)(b.5) amended, p. 103, § 1, effective March 21.

L. 2006:

(2)(b)(II) amended, p. 2021, § 114, effective July 1; (2)(b.5) amended, p. 1407, § 75, effective August 7.

L. 2008:

(2.5) added, p. 167, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(2)(b.5) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 806, § 81, effective April 29.

L. 2013:

(2) (a) amended, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1812, § 52, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2017:

(2)(b.5) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1378, § 299, effective May 25; (2)(b)(II) amended, (SB 17-226), ch. 159, p. 590, § 9, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

(3)(a)(I) repealed and (3)(b)(I) and (3)(b)(III) amended, (HB 21-1019), ch. 122, p. 485, § 29, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(2)(b.5) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3237, § 48, effective August 10.

Cross references:

(1) For the care and treatment of persons with developmental disabilities, see article 10.5 of title 27.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

30-28-116. Regulations may be amended.

From time to time the board of county commissioners may amend the number, shape, boundaries, or area of any district, or any regulation of or within such district, or any other provisions of the zoning resolution. Any such amendment shall not be made or become effective unless the same has been proposed by or is first submitted for the approval, disapproval, or suggestions of the county planning commission. If disapproved by such commission within thirty days after such submission, such amendment, to become effective, shall receive the favorable vote of not less than a majority of the entire membership of the board of county commissioners. Before finally adopting any such amendment, the board of county commissioners shall hold a public hearing thereon, and at least fourteen days' notice of the time and place of such hearing shall be given by at least one publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 301, § 15.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-15.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 965, § 5, effective June 1.

30-28-117. Board of adjustment.

The board of county commissioners of any county which enacts zoning regulations under the authority of this part 1 shall provide for a board of adjustment of three to five members and for the manner of the appointment of such members. Not more than half of the members of such board may at any time be members of the planning commission. The board of county commissioners shall fix per diem compensation and terms for the members of such board of adjustment, which terms shall be of such length and so arranged that the term of at least one member will expire each year. Any member of the board of adjustment may be removed for cause by the board of county commissioners upon written charges and after a public hearing. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as in the case of original appointments. The board of county commissioners may appoint associate members of such board, and, in the event that any regular member is temporarily unable to act owing to absence from the county, illness, interest in a case before the board, or any other cause, his place may be taken during such temporary disability by an associate member designated for that purpose.

The board of county commissioners shall provide and specify in its zoning or other resolutions general rules to govern the organization, procedure, and jurisdiction of said board of adjustment, which rules shall not be inconsistent with the provisions of this part 1. The board of adjustment may adopt supplemental rules of procedure not inconsistent with this part 1 or such general rules.

Any zoning resolution of the board of county commissioners may provide that the board of adjustment, in appropriate cases and subject to appropriate principles, standards, rules, conditions, and safeguards set forth in the zoning resolution, may make special exceptions to the terms of the zoning regulations in harmony with their general purpose and intent. Where feasible, special exception may be made for the purpose of providing access to sunlight for solar energy devices. The board of county commissioners may also authorize the board of adjustment to interpret the zoning maps and pass upon disputed questions of lot lines or district boundary lines or similar questions, as they may arise in the administration of the zoning regulations.

Meetings of the board of adjustment shall be held at the call of the chairman and at such other times as the board in its rules of procedure may specify. The chairman, or in his absence the acting chairman, may administer oaths and compel the attendance of witnesses by application to the district court. The court, upon proper showing, may issue subpoenas and enforce obedience by contempt proceedings. All meetings of the board of adjustment shall be open to the public. The board shall keep minutes of its proceedings showing the vote of each member upon each question, or, if absent or failing to vote, indicating such fact, and shall keep records of its examinations and other official actions, all of which shall be immediately filed in the office of the board and shall be a public record.

The governing body of a county that has entered into an intergovernmental agreement with a municipality located or partially located within that county for the purposes of joint participation in land use planning, subdivision procedures, and zoning pursuant to the authority granted in section 31-23-227 (2), C.R.S., may enter into an intergovernmental agreement with that municipality for the purpose of establishing a joint zoning board of adjustment for a specific area designated in the intergovernmental agreement.

Source:

L. 39:

p. 301, § 16.

CSA:

C. 45A, § 16.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-16.

L. 79:

(3) amended, p. 1161, § 6, effective May 25.

L. 98:

(5) added, p. 689, § 1, effective May 18.